Utah statutes.
63M-1-3305.   Duties of director.

(1)  The director shall:

(a)  assure that the purposes outlined in Subsection 63M-1-3304(3) are fulfilled; and

(b)  organize and provide administrative oversight to the office staff.

(2)  By following the procedures and requirements of Title 63J, Chapter 5, Federal Funds Procedures Act, the office may:

(a)  seek federal grants or loans;

(b)  seek to participate in federal programs; and

(c)  in accordance with applicable federal program guidelines, administer federally funded outdoor recreation programs.

(3)  For purposes of administering this part, the office may make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.



Enacted by Chapter 25, 2013 General Session

